Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6204
Applicant group,
defined.

Applicant group shall mean any health
professional group or organization, any individual, or any other interested
party which proposes that any health professional group not previously regulated
be regulated by the division or
which proposes to change the scope of practice of a regulated health profession.

Laws 1985, LB 407, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB834, § 6.